Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.704

[Art. 96] Releasing prisoner without proper authority.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his or her charge, or who through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 783; 1963 c 220 s 95.]